Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1107.05
Director of Administrative Services;
interfund borrowing; powers and duties.

(1) The Director
of Administrative Services may initiate interfund borrowing among the various
revolving funds within the Department of Administrative Services, except that
at no time shall the aggregate advances from all lending funds exceed five
hundred thousand dollars.

(2) The director shall report to the budget administrator of the budget
division of the department and the Legislative Fiscal Analyst:

(a) The amount of each interfund loan processed or repaid and the date
of the transaction; and

(b) An explanation of each interfund loan transaction.

The report submitted
to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall be submitted electronically.

(3) By July 15 each year, the director shall report to the budget administrator
and the Legislative Fiscal Analyst the:

(a) Outstanding aggregate balances advanced from the respective revolving
funds within the department as of the preceding June 30; and

(b) Outstanding aggregate balances borrowed by each fund from the respective
revolving funds within the department as of the preceding June 30.

The report submitted
to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall be submitted electronically.

Laws 2001, LB 96, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 179.